Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1765.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2182. Insurance benefits for part-time police officers.(a) Provision.--A police department shall provide each part-time police officer employed by the police department with insurance benefits covering the following:(1) Health insurance for the police officer, the police officer's spouse and dependents.(2) Disability resulting from the performance of the police officer's duties.(3) Survivor benefits resulting from the performance of the police officer's duties.(b) Matching benefits.--The benefits provided under 123456789101112131415161718 subsection (a) shall be the same as benefits provided to full-time police officers employed by the police department, or if there are no full-time police officers, the benefits shall match benefits provided to the Pennsylvania State Police.(c) Multiple employment.--(1) If a part-time police officer is employed by multiple police departments, the part-time police officer may choose from which police department to accept the benefits provided under subsection (a).(2) The part-time police officer shall provide proof that the police officer is receiving benefits from another municipality to each police department employing the police officer that does not provide benefits to the police officer.(3) If the part-time police officer is no longer employed by the police department from which the part-time police officer is receiving benefits, the part-time police officer may choose to receive insurance benefits from another police department by which the police officer is employed.(4) A part-time police officer may only receive benefits from one police department at a time.(d) Collective bargaining.--Nothing under this section shall limit the ability of part-time police officers to collectively bargain or contract with a police department for the benefits under subsection (a), if the minimum requirements of subsection (a) are met.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Police department." As defined under section 2162 (relating to definitions).20250HB1765PN2174 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Police officer." As defined under section 2162.Section 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB1765PN2174 - 3 - 123